Utah statutes.
41-6a-1701.   Backing -- When permissible.
(1)  The operator of a vehicle may not back the vehicle unless the movement
can be made with safety and without interfering with other traffic.
(2)  The operator of a vehicle may not back the vehicle on a shoulder or
roadway of a limited-access roadway.
